Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SENIOR NUTRITION PROGRAMS.new text end new text begin $4,700,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for senior nutrition programs under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.9752. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end